Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 6 Pretrial Procedure

38-2-1030.
Charges and specification.

Charges and specifications shall be signed by a person subject to this article under oath before a commissioned officer authorized by Code Section 38-2-1136 to administer oaths and shall state:

That the signer has personal knowledge of, or has investigated, the matters set forth therein; and

That the same are true in fact to the best of the signer’s knowledge and belief.

Upon the preferring of charges, the convening authority shall take immediate steps to determine what disposition should be made thereof in the interest of justice and discipline, and the person accused shall be informed of the charges as soon as practicable.

The preferring of charges and findings and sentence of a general court-martial or special court-martial, or other disposition of the charges of the general court-martial or special court-martial, shall be reported to the Georgia Crime Information Center. The Governor shall prescribe by regulations issued pursuant to Part 1 of Article 2 of this chapter the means, manner, and methods of such reporting to the Georgia Crime Information Center.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1030

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 830

.

38-2-1031.
Compulsory self-incrimination prohibited.

No person subject to this article shall compel any person to incriminate himself or herself or to answer any question the answer to which may tend to incriminate him or her.

No person subject to this article shall interrogate or request any statement from an accused or a person suspected of an offense without first informing him or her of the nature of the accusation and advising him or her that he or she does not have to make any statement regarding the offense of which he or she is accused or suspected and that any statement made by him or her may be used as evidence against him or her in a trial by court-martial.

No person subject to this article shall compel any person to make a statement or produce evidence before any military court if the statement or evidence is not material to the issue and may tend to degrade him or her.

No statement obtained from any person in violation of this article or through the use of coercion, unlawful influence, or unlawful inducement shall be received in evidence against him or her in a trial by court-martial.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1031

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

Cross references.

Rights of accused, U.S. Const., amend. 5 and Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. XVI.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 831

.

38-2-1032.
Investigation; cross-examination; effect of failure to perform.

No charge or specification shall be referred to a general court-martial for trial until a thorough and impartial investigation of all the matters set forth therein has been made unless such investigation has been waived in writing by the accused after consultation with his or her defense counsel. Such investigation shall include inquiry as to the truth of the matter set forth in the charges, consideration of the form of charges, and a recommendation as to the disposition which should be made of the case in the interest of justice and discipline.

The accused shall be advised of the charges against him or her and of the right to be represented at the investigation provided for by subsection (a) of this Code section by counsel. The accused has the right to be represented at such investigation as provided in Code Section 38-2-1038 and in regulations prescribed under that Code section. At such investigation, full opportunity shall be given to the accused to cross-examine witnesses against him or her, if they are available, and to present anything relevant he or she may desire in his or her own behalf, either in defense or mitigation, and the investigating officer shall examine available relevant witnesses requested by the accused. If the charges are forwarded after the investigation, they shall be accompanied by a statement of the substance of the testimony taken on both sides and a copy thereof shall be given to the accused.

If an investigation of the subject matter of an offense has been conducted before the accused is charged with the offense, and if the accused was present at the investigation and afforded the opportunities for representation, cross-examination, and presentation prescribed in subsection (b) of this Code section, no further investigation of that charge shall be necessary under this Code section unless it is demanded by the accused after he or she is informed of the charge. A demand for further investigation shall entitle the accused to recall witnesses for further cross-examination and to offer any new relevant evidence in the accused’s own behalf.

If evidence adduced in an investigation under this Code section indicates that the accused committed an uncharged offense, the investigating officer may investigate the subject matter of that offense without the accused having first been charged with the offense if the accused is:

Present at the investigation;

Informed of the nature of each uncharged offense investigated; and

Afforded the opportunities for representation, cross- examination, and presentation prescribed in subsection (b) of this Code section.

The requirements of this Code section shall be binding on all persons administering this article, but failure to follow them shall not constitute jurisdictional error.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1032

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 832

.

38-2-1033.
Forwarding of charges.

When a person is held for trial by general court-martial, the commanding officer shall, within three days after the accused is ordered into arrest or confinement, forward the charges, together with the investigation and allied papers, to the person exercising general court-martial jurisdiction.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1033

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 833

.

38-2-1034.
Advice of staff judge advocate and reference for trial; corrections.

Before directing the trial of any charge by general or special court-martial, the convening authority shall refer it to the staff judge advocate of the service of the accused for consideration and advice. The convening authority shall not refer a specification under a charge to a general or special court-martial for trial unless the convening authority has been advised in writing by the staff judge advocate of the service of the accused that:

The specification alleges an offense under this article;

The specification is warranted by the evidence indicated in the report of investigation as provided for under Code Section 38-2-1032, if there is such a report; and

A court-martial would have jurisdiction over the accused and the offense.

The advice of the staff judge advocate under subsection (a) of this Code section with respect to a specification under a charge shall include a written and signed statement by the staff judge advocate:

Expressing conclusions with respect to each matter set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section; and

Recommending action that the convening authority take regarding the specification.

If the specification is referred for trial, the recommendation of the staff judge advocate shall accompany the specification.

If the charges or specifications are not formally correct or do not conform to the substance of the evidence contained in the report of the investigating officer, formal corrections, and such changes in the charges and specifications as are needed to make them conform to the evidence, may be made.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1034

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 834

.

38-2-1035.
Service of copy of charges; time period before trial.

The trial counsel shall serve or cause to be served upon the accused a copy of the charges. No person shall, against his or her objection, be brought to trial before a general court-martial case within a period of five days after the service of charges upon him or her, or before a special court-martial case within a period of three days after the service of charges upon him or her.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1035

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 835

.